Rhode Island, session 2025, SB194.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-40-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-40 entitled "Physical
Therapists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-40-7. Licensing of physical therapists.
(a) By Examination. The applicant is required to pass with a grade determined by the board,
an examination approved by the department in consultation with the board; physical therapists
licensed under the provisions of this chapter on August 31, 1982, shall continue to be licensed.
(b) Without Examination by Endorsement. A license to practice physical therapy may be
issued without examination to an applicant who has been licensed by examination as a physical
therapist under the laws of another state or territory or District of Columbia, if, in the opinion of
the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of physical therapists in this state.
(c)(1) Graduate Practice. Every graduate of a board-approved physical therapy school who
has filed a physical therapy application may, upon receiving a permit from the department of health,
perform as a physical therapist under the supervision of a physical therapist licensed in this state.
(2) During this period, the applicant shall identify him or herself only as a “graduate
physical therapist.”
(3) If the applicant fails to take the examination, as specified in subsection (a), within ninety
(90) days from effective date of graduate status, without cause, or fails to pass the examination and
receive a license, all privileges provided in subsections (c)(1) and (c)(2) automatically cease. Such
privileges shall be reinstated upon the applicant filing and registering for a second and the next

available scheduled examination; provided, however, that the privileges shall automatically cease
if the applicant fails to take or to pass the second examination attempt. Such privileges shall be
reinstated upon the applicant filing and registering for a third and the next available scheduled
examination; provided, however, that the privileges shall automatically cease if the applicant fails
to take or to pass the third examination.
(d)(1) Foreign-Trained Applicants. If the foreign-trained applicant has successfully met the
requirements of the rules and regulations, the applicant’s credentials shall be accepted by the board.
(2) Prior to becoming licensed in this state, the foreign-trained applicant must also meet all
of the appropriate requirements described in this section or its equivalent as established in rules and
regulations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000413
========
LC000413 - Page 2 of 3